Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 2. Seasons, Waters, and Limits
§ 122. Section 122 effective until January 1, 2022; see also section 122 effective January 1, 2022 set out below. Fish Management Regulation.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4081(b)
. In adopting this rule, the Fish and Wildlife Board is following the policy established by the General Assembly that the protection, propagation, control, management, and conservation of fish, wildlife and
furbearing animals in this state is in the interest of the public welfare and that the safeguarding of this valuable resource for the people of the state requires a constant and continual vigilance.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4082
, this rule is designed to maintain the best health, population and utilization levels of Vermont’s fisheries.

In accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 4083
, this rule establishes open seasons; establishes daily, season, possession limits and size limits; prescribes the manner and means of taking fish; and prescribes the manner of transportation and exportation
of fish.

Purpose.

It is the policy of the State that the protection, propagation control, management and conservation of fish, wildlife, and furbearing animals in this State is in the interest of the public welfare, and that safeguarding of this valuable resource for the
people of the State requires a constant and continual vigilance.

Open-Water Fishing, legal methods of taking fish.

Definitions

Department — Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife.

Commissioner — Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife Commissioner.

Open-water fishing — Fishing by means of hook and line in hand or attached to a rod or other device in open water. Fishing by casting or trolling baited hooks, artificial flies or lures is considered open-water fishing.

Baited Hook — A single shank hook with 1, 2, or 3 points which may be baited with natural or artificial bait or both.

Lure — A man-made device designed to catch only 1 fish at a time, to include a spoon, plug, spinner, bait harness, tandem hook streamer or lead head jig.

Fly — A single pointed hook dressed with feathers, hair, thread, tinsel, or any similar material wound on or about the hook to which no hooks, spinners, spoons, or similar devices have been added.

Handheld Spear — A manually powered spear used from above the water’s surface.

Speargun — A pneumatic or rubber band powered device, with a line not to exceed 20 feet attached to a spear, used from below the water’s surface.

Cull Fish — Carp, tench, rudd, shad (alewife and gizzard shad), and goldfish. Additional invasive/exotic fish species may be designated by the Commissioner as “cull fish.”

Immediate Control — Such constant control as would enable the angler to respond forthwith to a fish taking their bait, lure or fly promptly and without any delay.

Snagging — Snagging shall mean the intentional hooking of a fish in a place other than the inside of the fish’s mouth. No person shall pull, jerk or otherwise purposefully and/or repeatedly manipulate a hook, or hooks and line to snag or hook a fish
in any method other than to entice a fish into taking, by mouth, a hook, lure or fly. Repeated and/or exaggerated jerking or pulling of the fishing line and/or hooks in any attempt to snag fish, whether it results in physically
snagging a fish or not, shall be prima facie evidence that snagging has taken place. This shall not apply to the use of a gaff to land a fish that has been legally hooked.

Whether still fishing, casting, or trolling in Vermont waters, a person may take fish only by using not more than two lines over which he or she has immediate control and to each of which lines is attached not more than two baited hooks, or more than
three artificial flies, or more than two lures with or without bait, except that at Seymour Lake and Little Averill Lake a person may take fish only by using not more than one line.

A person open-water fishing shall not take fish through the ice, from the ice, or from an object supported by the ice.

A person shall not take any fish pursuant to subsection (3.2) unless it is hooked in the mouth. Any fish taken under subsection (3.2) that is not hooked in the mouth shall be immediately released pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 4602. A fish hooked in any part
of the body other than in the mouth shall be considered to be foul hooked, and shall be prima facie evidence of foul hooking.

Taking or attempting to take fish by snagging is prohibited in all Vermont Waters.

Ice Fishing.

Definitions

Ice Fishing — Ice fishing is defined as fishing by means of hook and line in hand or attached to a rod, tip-up, jack or bob, where the angler is fishing through a hole in the ice, from the ice or on an object supported by the ice. Fishing by casting
or trolling baited hooks, artificial flies or lures shall not be considered ice fishing.

Fish may be taken through the ice with not more than two baited hooks or three artificial flies or two lures on each line. A person shall not operate more than eight lines, except on Lake Champlain where no more than 15 lines may be operated, and except
on Seymour and Little Averill Lakes, where not more than four lines may be operated.

A person ice fishing shall at all times, have immediate control over all lines they operate. A person ice fishing shall be able to visually observe lines they operate. Any line that indicates a fish shall be tended with 30 minutes.

A person shall not take any fish pursuant to subsection (4.2) unless it is hooked in the mouth. Any fish taken under subsection (4.2) that is not hooked in the mouth shall be immediately released pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 4602
. A fish hooked in any part of the body other than in the mouth shall be considered to be foul hooked, and shall be prima facie evidence of foul hooking.

The definitions of section 3 are applicable to this section.

Taking or attempting to take fish by snagging is prohibited in all Vermont Waters.

Lake Champlain Boundaries.

Lake Champlain proper shall be considered to include the setback at the same level and the major tributaries to the lake to the following boundaries:

Dead Creek to Panton Road bridge in Panton;

East Creek to the falls in Orwell (downstream of Mount Independence Road);

Lamoille River to the top of first dam (Peterson Dam) in Milton;

LaPlatte River to the falls in Shelburne (under Falls Road bridge);

Lewis Creek to falls in North Ferrisburgh (just upstream of Old Hollow Road);

Little Otter Creek to falls in Ferrisburgh Center (downstream of Little Chicago Road);

Malletts Creek to the first falls upstream of Roosevelt Highway (US 2 and US 7) in Colchester;

Mill River in Georgia to the falls in Georgia (just upstream of Georgia Shore Road bridge);

Missisquoi River to the top of Swanton Dam in the Village of Swanton;

Mud Creek to the dam in Alburg (just upstream of Route 78 bridge);

Otter Creek to the top of the dam in the city of Vergennes;

Poultney River to Central Vermont Power Dam at Carver Falls in West Haven;

Rock River to first Canadian border crossing;

Winooski River to the Winooski One hydropower dam west of Main Street (US 7) in Winooski and Burlington;

Clyde River: Catch and Release.

Between September 1 and October 31, on the Clyde River from Lake Memphremagog upstream to Charleston Dam (Lubber Lake), West Charleston, a person may fish with artificial flies and lures only, and all salmon caught must be released.

Seasonally Closed Waters.

The following lakes and ponds or portions thereof are hereby designated seasonally closed waters and shall be closed to all fishing except during the open season for trout as provided in section 8 of these regulations:

Adams Reservoir, Woodford

Ansel Pond, Bethel

Baker Pond, Barton

Bald Hill Pond, Westmore

Bean Pond, Sutton

Beaver Pond, Holland

Beck Pond, Newark

Beebe Pond, Sunderland

Big Averill Lake, Norton and Averill

Big Mud Pond, Mt. Tabor

Blake Pond, Sutton

Bourn Pond, Sunderland

Branch Pond, Sunderland

Brown Pond, Westmore

Caspian Lake, Greensboro

Center Pond, Newark

Colby Pond, Plymouth

Cow Mountain Pond, Granby

Crystal Lake, Barton

Duck Pond, Sutton

Dufresne Pond, Manchester

East Long Pond, Woodbury

Echo Lake, Charleston

Ewell Pond, Peacham

Forest Lake, Averill

Goshen Dam (Sugar Hill Reservoir), Goshen

Griffith Lake, Mt. Tabor

Hapgood Pond, Peru

Hartwell Pond, Albany

Holland Pond, Holland

Jobs Pond, Westmore

Knapp Brook Pond No. 1, Reading and Cavendish

Knapp Brook Pond No. 2, Reading and Cavendish

Lake Dunmore-Salisbury and Leicester - Except from Sucker Brook to the island south, which shall be open.

Levi Pond, Groton

Lewis Pond, Lewis

Little Averill Lake, Averill

Little Elmore Pond, Elmore

Little Rocky Pond, Wallingford

Long Pond, Newbury

Long Pond, Westmore

Maidstone Lake, Maidstone

Marl Pond, Sutton

Martins Pond, Peacham

May Pond, Barton

McIntosh Pond, Royalton

Mud Pond, Hyde Park

Nelson Pond (Forest Lake), Calais and Woodbury

Nichols Pond, Woodbury

North Pond, Chittenden

Norton Pond, Norton

Notch Pond, Ferdinand

Noyes (Seyon) Pond, Groton

Peacham Pond, Peacham

Perch Pond, (Zack Woods Pond), Hyde Park

Pigeon Pond, Groton

Red Mill Pond, Woodford

Seymour Lake, Morgan

Shadow Lake, Glover

Silver Lake, Leicester

South America Pond, Ferdinand

South Pond, Marlboro

Spring Lake, Shrewsbury

Stannard Pond, Stannard

Sterling Pond, Cambridge

Stoughton Pond, Weathersfield

Stratton Pond, Stratton

Sunset Lake, Benson

Unknown Pond, Averys Gore

Unknown Pond, Ferdinand

Vail Pond, Sutton

Vernon Hatchery Pond, Vernon

West Mountain Pond, Maidstone

Wheeler Pond, Barton and Sutton

Willoughby Lake, Westmore

Zack Woods, (Perch Pond), Hyde Park

All streams are hereby designated seasonally closed waters and shall be closed to all fishing except during the open season for trout as provided in section 8 of these regulations; and

except that the following streams shall be open to trout fishing only, and no fishing for other species shall be allowed, from November 1 to the Friday before the second Saturday in April, as set forth in Table 7.2.2.

: STREAMS OPEN TO FISHING FOR TROUT ONLY FROM NOVEMBER 1 TO THE FRIDAY BEFORE THE SECOND WEEK IN APRIL

Fish — Open Seasons, Size Restrictions and Daily Bag Limits.

Fish of the species named or described in the tables set forth below may be taken:

In the waters specified in column 1, by the method specified in column 2, during the open season specified in column 3.

Provided they meet any size restrictions specified in column 4., and only in numbers listed under daily bag limits specified in column 5., under no circumstances may a person take in one day, more than the daily bag or weight limit from a listed body
of water. No person may take in aggregate more than the daily State-wide aggregate limit for any species listed.

Businesses may buy lawfully taken fish, with the approval of the Commissioner, pursuant to the Commercial angling rules set forth in 10 V.S.A. App. 123.

Possession limits are equal to twice the daily bag limits. Fish species with limit restrictions may not be possessed in excess of the possession limits at any time.

No person shall have live fish in their possession that are transported in a manner which attempts to keep them alive when leaving waters of the State (

10 V.S.A. § 1251(13)
), except as follows:

.1 the person has been issued a Commercial Bait Dealers Permit by the Commissioner,

.2 the person has been issued scientific collection permit by the Commissioner which specifically approves of the activity,

.3 the person has been issued a fish transportation permit by the Commissioner which specifically approves of the activity,

.4 the person has been issued a fish breeders permit or fish importation permit by the Commissioner which specifically approves of the activity.

The daily bag limit for a fish species on a water body with a closed season for that fish species is zero.

“General waters” restrictions are the provisions applicable to all waters of the State, except the waters specifically named or described.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, fish not listed in this regulation may be taken at any time and without size or catch limit, in waters not listed as seasonally closed waters in Section 7 of these regulations.

Open Seasons, Size Restrictions and Daily Bag Limits Tables

STATEWIDE AGGREGATE DAILY BAG LIMITS (Maximum number of a fish species that may be taken in one day)

Click to view

BROOK, BROWN AND RAINBOW TROUT

Click to view

TROPHY TROUT STREAMS

Click to view

RAINBOW TROUT (Including STEELHEAD) / BROWN TROUT

Click to view

BROOK, BROWN, RAINBOW, LAKE TROUT AND SALMON — 2 FISH AGGREGATE LIMITS

Click to view

STREAMS OPEN TO YEAR ROUND TROUT FISHING

Click to view

LAKE TROUT AND SALMON

Click to view

SPECIAL ICE FISHING PROVISIONS FOR BROOK, BROWN, RAINBOW, LAKE TROUT, SALMON AND BASS

Click to view

SPECIAL REGULATION TROUT STREAMS

Click to view

ANADROMOUS ATLANTIC SALMON

Click to view

AMERICAN SHAD

Click to view

BOWFIN, REDHORSE SUCHER MULLET, LONGNOSE GAR.

Click to view

SUCKER (LONGNOSE AND WHITE), and CULL FISH

Click to view

BULLHEAD

Click to view

NORTHERN PIKE

Click to view

CHAIN AND REDFIN PICKEREL

Click to view

MUSKELLUNGE

Click to view

SMELT

Click to view

BLACK AND WHITE CRAPPIE

Click to view

YELLOW PERCH

Click to view

LARGEMOUTH AND SMALLMOUTH BASS

Click to view

WALLEYE

Click to view

SAUGER

Click to view

Spawning grounds for game fish — generally.

The below listed waters are declared spawning grounds for game fish and are hereby closed to the taking of fish from second Saturday in April through May 31 annually.

Chittenden County

Joiner Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1,900 feet to the first falls.

Pinneo Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 100 feet to the railroad crossing.

Preston Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 2,600 feet to the first falls.

Orleans County

Black River — From 600 feet below the falls at Old Harman Mill in Coventry upstream to the top of falls at Old Harman Mill in Coventry.

Ware Brook — From the downstream edge of the furthest downstream bridge/culvert on Back Coventry Road (TH #8 in Irasburg) upstream approximately one mile to top of the first major natural falls on Ware Brook.

Alder (Stony) Brook — From its confluence with the Black River upstream 3 1/2 miles to the outlet of Sargent Pond, in Coventry.

Willoughby River — From the confluence of the Brownington Branch of the Willoughby River in Brownington upstream to the downstream edge of the bridge on Vermont Route 58 in the village of Evansville (Brownington); and from the downstream edge of bridge
on the Tarbox Hill Road in Orleans Village upstream to the top of the natural falls upstream of the bridge on Tarbox Hill Road in Orleans Village.

Dorin, Wells, Myers, Schoolhouse and Mill Brooks — From mouth of brooks at Lake Willoughby upstream approximately 3/4 mile in Dorin Brook, all of Wells Brook, 1/2 mile in Myers Brook, 1/4 mile in the Schoolhouse Brook and 1/4 mile in Mill Brook and tributaries,
all in Westmore. For identification purpose these brooks are arranged in order from north to south, and flow through Vermont Agency of Transportation structures on Route 5A number 10, 9, 8, 7 and 6, respectively.

Brownington Branch of the Willoughby River in Brownington — From its confluence at the Willoughby River extending upstream to the second road crossing on Brownington Chilafoux Road (TH #15). Said crossing is located approximately 2.4 miles from Brownington
Center on Chilafoux Road (TH #15).

Country Club Brook — From its confluence with the Willoughby River extending upstream to Hollow Road (TH #14) in Barton.

Porter Brook, Greensboro — From Caspian Lake upstream to its headwaters. (1987, Fish and Wildlife Commissioner’s Reg. No. 970, eff. April 1, 1987.)

Johns River — From the downstream edge of the bridge on Beebe Road (TH #3) upstream approximately two tenths of a mile to the downstream edge of bridge on Elm Street (TH #2) in Derby.

Outlet Brook — From the highway bridge near Echo Lake in Charleston upstream to the top of dam at outlet of Seymour Lake.

Washington County

Chase Brook — From its confluence with the Dog River upstream approximately 1/2 mile to the top of the natural falls in Berlin.

Ridley Brook, Duxbury — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1,700 feet to the first falls.

Windsor County

Lilliesville Brook in the Town of Stockbridge from its confluence with the White River upstream to the 2nd bridge on the Lilliesville Brook Road.

Locust Creek in Bethel from its confluence with the White River upstream to the 2nd bridge on Rt. 12.

The below named waters are closed from March 16 through May 31:

Chittenden County

Lamoille River — From the downstream edge of the bridge on Bear Trap Road in Milton (referred to as the West Milton Bridge upstream to the top of first dam (Peterson Dam)) in Milton.

Winooski River —From the Winooski One Hydro dam west of Main Street (US 7) in Winooski and Burlington and extending downstream to the downstream side of the first railroad bridge.

Franklin County

Missisquoi River — From the top of the Swanton dam in the Village of Swanton downstream approximately 850 feet to the water treatment plant on the west side of the river, and downstream approximately 850 feet to the upstream end of the cement breakwater
on the east side of the river. (1988, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 975, eff. April 7, 1988.)

The below named waters are closed from March 16 to the Friday before the 1st Saturday in May, both dates inclusive:

Franklin County

Missisquoi River — From the top of the Swanton Dam in the Village of Swanton extending downstream 5,120 feet to the Northwest corner (downstream) of the Riverside Cemetery and across the river to a pole on the Northeast bank.

The below named waters are closed to fishing year-round:

Orleans County

Clyde River — From 260 feet below the top of the abandoned Mill Dam immediately upstream of the Number 1, 2, 3 hydroelectric powerhouse in Newport City, upstream to the top of the abandoned Mill Dam immediately upstream of the Number 1, 2, 3 hydroelectric
powerhouse in Newport City.

The below named waters are closed from October 1 through October 31:

Orleans County

Johns River — From the downstream edge of the first bridge (culvert) upstream of Lake Memphremagog on North Derby Road (TH #6) upstream to U.S. 5, in Derby.

7.1, 7.2, 7.2.1, and 8.4 amended generally.

Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed below: Artificial fly or lure only November 1 to the Friday before the 2nd Saturday in April: Catch and release only Zero-All trout must be immediately released to the water where
taken: From the top of the Lovejoy Dam in Springfield upstream to the Howard Hill Road Bridge in Cavendish. Black River From the Woods Road (Medburyville) bridge in Wilmington upstream approximately 2 miles to the VT Route 9W bridge
in Searsburg. Deerfield River From the confluence with Otter Creek upstream (approximately 2.7 miles) to the top of the Patch Dam in Rutland City. East Creek (Rutland City) From the Vermont/New York border upstream to the Vermont/Massachusetts
border. Hoosic River From the top of the hydroelectric dam at Fairfax Falls upstream to the top of the Cady’s Falls Dam in Morristown. Lamoille River From the confluence with Passumpsic River upstream to the downstream edge of
the Concord Avenue bridge in St. Johnsbury. Moose River From the top of the Center Rutland Falls in Rutland upstream to the Danby-Mt. Tabor Forest Road Bridge (Forest Road #10) in Mt. Tabor. Otter Creek From the Connecticut River
boundary upstream to the top of Arnolds Falls Dam in St. Johnsbury. Passumpsic River From the Vermont/New York border in Bennington upstream to the top of the former Vermont Tissue Plant Dam (downstream of Murphy Road) in Bennington.
Walloomsac River From the top of the Bolton Dam in Waterbury and Duxbury upstream to the VT Route 2/100 in Duxbury and Waterbury. Winooski River

Click to view

FISH SPECIES DAILY AGGREGRATE LIMITS Brook Trout 12 fish Brown and Rainbow Trout Maximum Combination of 6 fish Lake Trout 2 fish, (3 if taken from Lake Champlain) Salmon 2 fish Large and Smallmouth Bass Maximum combination of 5 fish Northern Pike 5 fish
Chain Pickerel 10 fish Muskellunge 0 fish Walleye 3 fish Black and White Crappie 25 fish American Shad 0 fish Yellow Perch 50 fish Yellow Perch exception Lake Champlain — No daily limit Sauger 0 fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General waters. (except as listed below) Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 No restriction 6 trout Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season
Minimum length of 12 inches 3 trout Rivers and Streams Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 No restriction 12 trout, of which not more than 6 can be brown and/or rainbow

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 No restriction 2 trout in aggregate along Rt. 131 in Weathersfield and Cavendish, - from Downers covered
bridge upstream (approximately 4 miles) to the next bridge across the river, The Howard Hill Bridge. Black River in Rutland City — From the confluence with Otter Creek upstream (approximately 2.7 miles) to the top of the Patch Dam
in Rutland City. East Creek From the downstream edge of the bridge on Route 104 in the Village of Fairfax upstream (approximately 1.6 miles) to the top of the Fairfax Falls Dam in Fairfax. Lamoille River — From the confluence with
Winooski River in Waterbury upstream to the top of the Waterbury Reservoir Dam in Waterbury. Little River in Enosburg and Sheldon — From the downstream edge of Kane Road (TH-3) bridge upstream (approximately 5.7 miles) to the top of
the Enosburg Falls Dam in Enosburg Falls. Missisquoi River in Danby and Mt. Tabor — From the Vermont Railway Bridge north of the fishing access upstream (approximately 2 miles) to the Danby-Mt. Tabor Forest Rd. Bridge (Forest Road
# 10). Otter Creek in the Village of St. Johnsbury — From the top of the Gage Dam in St. Johnsbury upstream (approximately 2.4 miles) to the top of the Arnold Falls Dam. Passumpsic River — From the confluence with the Passumpsic River
upstream (approximately 350 feet) to the downstream edge of the Concord Avenue bridge in the Village of St. Johnsbury. Moose River in Shaftsbury and Bennington—From the Vermont/New York border in Shaftsbury upstream to the top of the
former Vermont Tissue Plant Dam (downstream of Murphy Road) in Bennington. Walloomsac River in Duxbury and Waterbury — From the top of the Bolton Dam in Duxbury and Waterbury upstream to the Route 2 Bridge (east side of Waterbury Village).
Winooski River

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 Minimum length of 10 inches 2 trout Caspian Lake, Greensboro Echo Lake, Charleston Lake Memphremagog (including
South Bay), Coventry, Derby, Newport City and Newport; Willoughby Lake, Westmore Lakes and Ponds Orleans County: Barton River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side of the US Route 5 bridge southernmost and closest
to the Village of Barton in Barton. Black River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side of the VT Route 14 / 58 bridge in Irasburg. Johns River — From the downstream edge of the first bridge (culvert) upstream of Lake
Memphremagog on North Derby Road (TH #6) upstream to U.S. 5, in Derby. Willoughby River — The entire Willoughby River, from confluence with Barton River in Barton upstream to the Willoughby Lake outlet in Westmore. Rivers and Streams:

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 See regulations for specific bodies of waters Two fish in aggregate Big Averill Lake, Norton and Averill
Caspian Lake, Greensboro Center Pond, Newark Crystal Lake, Barton East Long Pond, Woodbury Echo Lake, Charleston Elligo Lake, Craftsbury and Greensboro Forest Lake (Nelson Pond), Calais and Woodbury Harveys Lake, Barnet Jobs Pond,
Westmore Lake Dunmore, Salisbury Lake Memphremagog (including South Bay), Coventry, Derby, Newport City and Newport Little Averill Lake, Averill Long Pond, Westmore Maidstone Lake, Maidstone Martins Pond, Peacham Nelson Pond (Forest
Lake), Calais and Woodbury Nichols Pond, Woodbury Seymour Lake, Morgan Shadow Lake, Glover Spring Lake, Shrewsbury Sunset Lake, Benson Willoughby Lake, Westmore.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit The following portions of the specified rivers shall be open to fishing for trout year round: (Listed below) Artificial fly or lure only, except during the open season for trout. No
closed season for catch and release only Catch and release only Zero - All trout must be immediately returned to the waters where taken, except during the open season, limits apply in accordance with the river selected. Open season;
from the 2nd Saturday in April through October 31 During the open season follow any species restrictions for the selected river — From the Connecticut River boundary upstream to the top of the Lovejoy Dam in Springfield. Black River
— From the Lake Champlain boundary (top of Peterson Dam in Milton) upstream to the top of the hydroelectric Dam at Fairfax Falls. Lamoille River — From the Lake Champlain boundary upstream to the State Prison Hollow Road (TH #3) bridge
in Starksboro. Lewis Creek — From Lake Champlain boundary upstream to the top of the Enosburg Falls Dam in Enosburg Falls. Missisquoi River — From the Connecticut River boundary upstream to the Union Village Dam in Thetford. Ompompanoosuc
River — From the Lake Champlain boundary upstream to top of Center Rutland Falls in Rutland. Otter Creek — From the Connecticut River boundary upstream to the top of the Central Vermont Power Dam in Bradford. Waits River — From the
Connecticut River boundary upstream to the Townshend Dam in Townshend. West River — From the Connecticut River boundary upstream to the bridge on Route 107 in Bethel. White River — From the Connecticut River boundary upstream to the
top of the dam at Brockway Mills Falls in Rockingham. Williams River — From the Lake Champlain boundary upstream to the Bolton Dam in Duxbury and Waterbury. Winooski River

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 Salmon - Minimum length of 15 inches Lake Trout - Minimum length of 18 inches
2 Lake Trout or 2 Salmon or 1 of each Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No Closed Season Lake Trout and Salmon - Minimum length of 15 inches 3 Lake Trout and 2 Salmon Little Averill Lake and Seymour Lake Open-water fishing,
with not more than 1 line Angling: second Saturday in April through October 31 Lake Trout - Minimum length of 20 inches 1 Lake Trout and 1 salmon or 2 Salmon Ice fishing with not more than 4 lines Ice fishing: third Saturday in January
through March 15 Salmon - Minimum length of 15 inches Clyde Pond, Salem Lake, Little Salem Lake, and Clyde River from Lake Memphremagog upstream to Citizen’s Charleston Dam (Lubber Lake), West Charleston Open-water fishing Second Saturday
in April through August 31 Lake Trout - Minimum length of 18 inches 2 Lake Trout or 2 Salmon or 1 of each Salmon - Minimum length of 17 inches Open-water fishing: Clyde River from Lake Memphremagog to Charleston Dam - Artificial flies
and lures only September 1 through October 31 Lake Trout - Minimum length of 18 inches 2 Lake Trout, 0 Salmon (all salmon must be immediately released Lake Memphremagog (including South Bay Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April
through October 31 Lake Trout - Minimum length of 18 inches 2 Lake Trout or 2 Salmon or 1 of each Ice Fishing Third Saturday in January through March 15 Salmon - Minimum length of 17 inches Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday
in April through October 31 Lake Trout— Minimum length of 18 inches 2 Lake Trout or 2 Salmon or 1 of each Salmon - Minimum length of 17 inches Orleans County: Barton River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side of
the US Route 5 bridge southernmost and closest to the Village of Barton in Barton. Black River — From Lake Memphremagog upstream to the downstream side of the VT Route 14 / 58 bridge in Irasburg. Johns River — From the downstream edge
of the first bridge (culvert) upstream of Lake Memphremagog on North Derby Road (TH #6) upstream to U.S. 5, in Derby. Willoughby River — The entire Willoughby River, from confluence with Barton River in Barton upstream to the Willoughby
Lake outlet in Westmore.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Listed below: Ice Fishing Third Saturday in January through March 15 See species restriction for individual body of water See species restriction for individual body of water Big Averill
Lake, Norton and Averill; Big Salem Lake, Derby; Caspian Lake, Greensboro; Chittenden Dam, Chittenden; Crystal Lake, Barton; Echo Lake, Charleston; Echo Lake, Plymouth; Eden Lake, Eden; Elligo Lake, Craftsbury and Greensboro; Glen
Lake, Castleton, Fair Haven, and Benson; Harriman Reservoir, Whitingham and Wilmington; Harveys Lake, Barnet; Island Pond, Brighton; Joes Pond, Cabot, Danville; Lake Bomoseen, Castleton and Hubbardton; Lake Dunmore, Leicester, and
Salisbury; Lake Fairlee, Thetford, West Fairlee, Fairlee; Lake Hortonia, Sudbury, Hubbardton; Lake Memphremagog (including South Bay), Coventry, Derby, Newport City and Newport; Lake Morey, Fairlee; Lake Rescue, Ludlow; Lake St. Catherine,
Wells, Poultney; Little Averill Lake, Averill; Little Salem Lake, Derby; Maidstone Lake, Maidstone; Marshfield Dam (Molly’s Falls Reservoir), Cabot; Miles Pond, Concord; Nelson Pond (Forest Lake), Calais and Woodbury; Newark Pond,
Newark Norton Pond, Norton; Parker Pond, Glover; Peacham Pond, Peacham; Pensioner Pond, Charleston; Seymour Lake, Morgan; Shadow Lake, Glover; Somerset Reservoir, Somerset; Sunset Lake, Benson; Wallace Pond, Canaan; Waterbury Reservoir,
Waterbury; Willoughby Lake, Westmore; Woodbury Lake, (Sabin Pond), Calais and Woodbury

1. Waters 2. Method 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit From the confluence with Lilliesville Brook in Stockbridge downstream 3.3 miles to 220 ft. downstream of the confluence with Cleveland Brook in Bethel. White River — Open-water fishing,
with artificial lures and flies only. Second Saturday in April through October 31. Minimum length of 18 inches 1 trout — From the downstream edge of the Route 153 bridge in Pawlet upstream (approximately 16 miles) to the downstream
edge of first bridge on Dorset Hollow Road and including tributary: Flower Brook upstream (approximately 1000 ft) to the downstream edge of the Route 30 bridge in Pawlet. Mettawee River Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through
October 31. 10 to 14 inches protected slot: (all trout 10 to 14 inches must be released) 2 trout, only 1 greater than 14 inches Winooski River Tributaries — Listed Below Open-water fishing June 1 through October 31 10 to 16 inches
protected slot: (all fish 10 to 16 inches must be released) 2 trout, only 1 greater than 16 inches Winooski River Tributaries — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1900 feet to the first falls. Joiner Brook,
Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 100 feet to the railroad crossing. Pinneo Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 2600 feet to the first falls. Preston
Brook, Bolton — From the confluence of the Winooski River upstream approximately 1700 feet to the first falls. Ridley Brook, Duxbury Listed Below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 10 to 16 inches protected
slot: (all fish 10 to 16 inches must be released) 2 trout, only 1 greater than 16 inches — From Munger Street Bridge in New Haven upstream (approximately 4.1 miles) to the South Street bridge in Bristol. New Haven River — From Preston
Brook mouth upstream (approximately 4.4 miles) to the Ridley Brook mouth. Winooski River From the New York State line upstream (approximately 20.6 miles) to downstream side of Depot Street Bridge (Route 11/30) in Manchester. Batten
Kill — Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through October 31 All trout must be immediately released. Zero, all trout must be immediately released. From the downstream edge of the Junction Road Bridge in Berlin/ Montpelier
upstream to the top of the Northfield Falls Dam in Northfield Dog River — Open-water fishing with artificial lures and flies only for anglers 15 years of age or older Second Saturday in April through October 31 All trout must be immediately
released Zero, all trout must be immediately released. Listed below: Open-water fishing Second Saturday in April through September 30 No size restriction. 12 trout of which not more than 6 can be brown and/or rainbow trout in aggregate.
Open-water fishing October 1, through October 31 All trout must be immediately released. Zero, all trout must be immediately released. In towns of Manchester and Dorset from the downstream side of Depot Street Bridge (Route 11/30)
in Manchester upstream (approximately 5.0 miles) to the downstream side of the US Route 7 Bridge south of East Dorset. Batten Kill (East Branch) — In the towns of Arlington and Sandgate from its confluence with Batten Kill upstream
(approximately 8.5 miles) to the confluence with Moffitt Hollow Brook in Beartown. Green River — In the towns of Arlington and Sunderland from its confluence with the Batten Kill upstream (approximately 3.0 miles) to the downstream
side of the Bridge #14 on Sunderland TH# 3 in East Kansas. Roaring Branch In the town of Arlington from its Confluence with the Roaring Branch upstream (approximately 0.8 miles) to the base of the so-called Hale Company Dam in East
Arlington. Warm Brook —

1. Waters 2. Method 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Connecticut River and tributaries No person shall take or attempt to take an anadromous Atlantic salmon, any salmon unintentionally taken shall be immediately released in accordance
with section 4602 No open season All fish must be immediately released Zero — All Anadromous Atlantic salmon must be immediately released

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit Connecticut River, including Vermont river tributaries Open-water fishing No closed season All shad must be released. Zero — All shad must be immediately released.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (and as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No more than 5 of any one species General Waters (Except seasonally closed waters and
as listed below Speargun, bow and crossbow all with line attached to arrow No closed season No restriction No more than 5 of any one species Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Open-water and ice fishing, speargun, bow and crossbow
all with line attached to arrow No closed season No restriction No more than 5 fish of any one species Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Shooting and Handheld Spear March 25 through May 25, Title 10 4606(e) No restriction
No more than 5 of any one species

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (and as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No Limit General Waters (Except seasonally closed waters and as listed below) speargun,
bow and crossbow all with line attached to arrow No Closed Season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Open-water and ice fishing, speargun, bow and crossbow all with line attached to arrow No closed season
No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Shooting and Handheld Spear March 25 through May 25, Title 10 4606(e) No restriction No Limit

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (and as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Open-water and ice fishing No closed
season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain, not to include tributaries Shooting and Handheld Spear March 25 through May 25, Title 10 4606(e) No restriction No Limit

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season Minimum length of 20 inches 5 Fish Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season Minimum
length of 20 inches 5 Fish Shooting and handheld spearing March 25 through May 25, 10 VSA 4606 Minimum length of 20 inches 5 Fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No Limit Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction
10 fish Shooting and handheld spearing March 25 through May 25 No restriction 10 fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing; Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only No closed season All muskellunge must be released Zero -
All muskellunge must be immediately released Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing; Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only No closed season All muskellunge must be released Zero - All muskellunge must be immediately
released Shooting and handheld spearing March 25 through May 25, 10 VSA 4606(e) Zero Fish

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit All waters Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction No limit

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits All waters Open-water and ice fishing No closed season Minimum length of 8 inches 25 fish, Combined

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limits General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction 50 fish Lake Champlain Open-water and ice fishing No closed season No restriction
No Limit Businesses may buy lawfully taken fish, with the approval of the Commissioner, pursuant to the Commercial angling rule set for in 10 V.S.A. APP § 123.

1. Waters 2. Methods 3. Season 4. Size 5. Daily Bag Restrictions Limit General Waters (except as listed below) Open-water fishing No closed season No restriction 5 fish Lakes, Ponds and reservoirs Open-water fishing (Ice fishing—see special provisions)
Second Saturday in June through Nov. 30/fh. t Minimum length of 10 inches 5 Fish Lakes, Ponds and reservoirs (seasonally closed) Open-water fishing: Catch and release with artificial lures and flies only Second Saturday in April through
the Friday before the Second Saturday in June, both dates inclusive. All bass must be released Zero — All bass must be immediately released Lakes, Ponds and reservoirs (not seasonally closed) Open-water fishing: Catch and release with
artificial lures and flies only Dec. 1 through the Friday before the Second Saturday in June, both dates inclusive. All bass must be released Zero — All bass must be immediately released Seasonally, Closed Waters — streams Open-water